New Jersey, session 221, A4322.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.    , c.  , the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 16 DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILIES 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55 Social Services Programs 1630 Division of Family and Community Partnerships GRANTS-IN-AID 03-1630  Family and Community Partnerships .................... $597,450 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Social Services Programs ................................... $597,450 Grans-in-Aid: 03    HomeFront NJ  Diaper Access Expansion Pilot Program         ($597,450) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT This FY 2025 supplemental appropriation provides $597,450 to the Department of Children and Families for a grant to HomeFront NJ for a Diaper Access Expansion Pilot Program.  HomeFronts mission is to end homelessness in Central New Jersey by harnessing the caring, resources, and expertise of the community.  After decades of informally providing diapers to the families, the organization began planning in 2016 for a more formalized Diaper Program.  In the years since, the demand for diapers has led HomeFront to expand significantly their diaper service to local families. These additional State resources would allow the organization to serve a larger region, with the potential for Statewide implementation.  According to the National Diaper Bank Network, 47 percent of parents in the United State reported diaper need in 2023.  Diaper need is defined as parents and caregivers inability to provide a sufficient supply of diapers to keep their babies clean, dry, and healthy.